pt-BR: Nível de saída: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
el: Επίπεδο εξόδου: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
sl-SI: Izhodna raven: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
fr: Niveau de sortie: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
sk-SK: Výstupná úroveň: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
de: Ausgabepegel: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Skleidžiamo garso lygis: Aukšta; Žema; Vidutinė; Kita
bg-BG: Изходно ниво: Високо; Ниско; Средно; Други
th: ระดับเอาท์พุท: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
it: Livello di uscita: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
vi: Trình độ đầu ra: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
tr: Çıkış seviyesi: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
cs: Výstupní úroveň: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
en: Output level: High; Low; Medium; Other
hu: Teljesítményszint: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
hr-HR: Izlazna razina: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
ko: 출력 레벨: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타
ro-RO: Nivel de ieșire: Ridicat; Redus; Mediu; Altele
zh-CN: 输出电平: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
pt-PT: Nível de saída: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
fi: Ulostulotaso: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
pl: Poziom wyjściowy: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne
ja: 出力レベル: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
nl: Uitgangsniveau: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
sv: Utgångsnivå: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
zh-TW: 輸出電平: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
da: Udgangsniveau: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
ru: Выходной уровень: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другой
nb: Utgangsnivå: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
es: Nivel de salida: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros